New York, session 2025-2026, A3380.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2975 of the public authorities 2 law, as added by chapter 62 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, every 5 public authority and every public benefit corporation created by or 6 pursuant to [New York] state law at least three of whose members are 7 appointed by the governor, whether such authority or corporation is 8 otherwise governed by this chapter (such entities, as so constituted, to 9 be hereafter in this title referred to as "public benefit corpo- 10 rations"), shall reimburse to [New York] the state an allocable share of 11 state governmental costs attributable to the provision of services to 12 public benefit corporations, as determined [herein] in this title. 13 Provided, however, that the provisions of this section and, for the 14 purposes of this section, the term "public benefit corporation" shall 15 not include the metropolitan transportation authority, as established in 16 title eleven of article five of this chapter. The payment of such costs 17 by public benefit corporations is a valid and proper purpose for which 18 available authority funds may be applied. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01804-01-5